tr: Donanım montaj türü: Tezgah üstü; Tezgah üstü; Zemine monte; Bağımsız; Taşınabilir; Duvara monte; Diğer
es: Tipo de montaje de hardware: Sobremesa; Encimera; Montaje en piso; Independiente; Portátil; Montaje en pared; Otros
ro-RO: Tip montare element hardware: Banc; Blat; Podea; De sine stătător; Portabil; De perete; Altele
sl-SI: Vrsta namestitve strojne opreme: Namizna plošča; Pult; Montaža na tla; Prostostoječe; Prenosno; Montaža na steno; Drugo
da: Hardwaremonteringstype: Bordplade; Bordplade; Gulvmonteret; Fritstående; Transportabel; Vægmonteret; Andet
pt-BR: Tipo de montagem de hardware: Bancada; Bancadas; Montado no chão; Sem suporte; Portátil; Montado na parede; Outro
bg-BG: Тип монтаж на железарски предмети: Настолен; Плот; Монтиран на пода; Свободностоящ; Преносим; Стенен монтаж; Други
sv: Monteringstyp med beslag: Bänkskiva; Bänkskiva; Golvmonterad; Fristående; Bärbar; Väggmonterad; Övrigt
it: Tipo di montaggio dell’hardware: Da banco; Controsoffitto; Montato a pavimento; Da posizionamento libero; Portatile; Montato a parete; Altro
fi: Laitteiston asennustapa: Pöytätaso; Työtaso; Lattiakiinnitteinen; Vapaasti seisova; Siirrettävät; Seinään kiinnitettävä; Muu
cs: Typ montáže hardwaru: Pracovní stůl; Pultová deska; Namontované na podlahu; Volně stojící; Přenosné; Montáž na stěnu; Jiné
en: Hardware mounting type: Benchtop; Countertop; Floor-mounted; Free-standing; Portable; Wall-mounted; Other
vi: Loại giá đỡ phần cứng: Mặt bàn; Trên mặt tủ quầy; Động cơ gắn trên sàn; Đứng một mình; Xách tay; Treo tường; Khác
ko: 하드웨어 장착 유형: 벤치탑; 카운터탑; 바닥 장착형; 독립형; 이동식; 벽걸이형; 기타
el: Τύπος τοποθέτησης υλικού: Πάγκου εργασίας; Πάγκου κουζίνας; Επιδαπέδιο; Ελεύθερης τοποθέτησης; Φορητό; Επιτοίχια; Άλλο
pt-PT: Tipo de montagem de hardware: Bancada; Tampo de bancada; Montagem de chão; Sem suporte; Portáteis; Com suporte de parede; Outro
sk-SK: Typ montáže technického vybavenia: Kuchynská pracovná doska; Pracovná doska; Namontovaný na podlahu; Voľne stojaci; Prenosný; Nástenný; Iné
hu: Fémáru rögzítési típusa: Asztalra szerelhető; Munkalapra szerelhető; Padlóra szerelhető; Szabadon álló; Hordozható; Falra szerelhető; Egyéb
nl: Type montage bouwmateriaal: Tafelblad; Aanrecht; Vloermontage; Vrijstaand; Draagbaar; Wandbevestiging; Andere
hr-HR: Način postavljanja metalnih komponenti: Radna ploha; Radna ploča; Podno; Samostojeće; Prijenosno; Zidno; Ostalo
ru: Способ установки оборудования или технического изделия: Настольный; Столешница; Напольный; Отдельно стоящий; Портативный; Настенный; Другой
de: Montageart der Hardware: Auf Arbeitsplatte; Arbeitsplatte; Bodenmontiert; Freistehend; Tragbar; Wandmontage; Sonstiges
ja: ハードウェアの取り付けタイプ: ベンチトップ; カウンタートップ; フロアマウント型; 自立型; ポータブル; ウォールマウント; その他
zh-TW: 硬體安裝類型: 台式; 檯面; 落地式; 獨立式; 可攜式; 壁掛式; 其他
lt-LT: Įrankių tvirtinimo tipas: Stalas; Stalviršis; Montuojami ant grindų; Laisvai pastatomi; Nešiojami; Sieniniai; Kita
zh-CN: 硬件安装方式: 台式; 台面; 落地式安装; 自力支撑; 便携式; 壁挂式; 其他
th: ประเภทการติดตั้งฮาร์ดแวร์: แบบตั้งบนโต๊ะ; ด้านบนเคาน์เตอร์; แบบตั้งพื้น; ตั้งพื้น; แบบพกพา; ยึดกับผนัง; อื่นๆ
nb: Monteringstype av maskinvare: Benketopp; Benkeplate; Gulvmontering; Frittstående; Bærbar; Veggfeste; Annet
fr: Type de montage matériel: Paillasse; Plan de travail; Montage au sol; Sur pied; Portable; Support mural; Autre
pl: Typ montażu sprzętu: Stół warsztatowy; Blat; Montowany na podłodze; Wolnostojący; Przenośny; Montowany na ścianie; Inne